Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5120YH (3) 91 as/js H.F. 2065 Section 1. Section 692A.106, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 5. A sex offender convicted of any subsequent sex offense, 3 including any expunged convictions , upon a second or subsequent 4 conviction that requires a second registration, upon conviction 5 of an aggravated offense, or if the sex offender has previously 6 been convicted of one or more offenses that would have required 7 registration under this chapter who is already required to 8 register as a sex offender , shall be required to register for 9 life and shall not be eligible to apply for removal from the 10 sex offender registry . 11 Sec. 2. Section 692A.108, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 12 amended to read as follows: 13 4. A photograph of the sex offender shall be updated, at 14 a minimum, annually. Photographs shall be taken with the 15 sex offender fully facing the camera with eyes open. Any 16 photographs displaying distortions, glare, or blurring shall be 17 retaken. The sheriff shall send the updated photograph to the 18 department using procedures established by the department by 19 rule within five business days of the photograph being taken 20 and the department shall post the updated photograph on the sex 21 offender registryâs internet site. The sheriff may require the 22 sex offender to submit to being photographed, fingerprinted, 23 or palm printed , more than once per year during any required 24 appearance to verify relevant information. 25 Sec. 3. Section 692A.128, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 26 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 27 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. The sex offender has no history of 28 recidivism involving a sex offense including previously 29 expunged convictions. 30 Sec. 4. Section 692A.128, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 31 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 32 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. The sex offender has no history of 33 recidivism involving a sex offense including previously 34 expunged convictions. 35 -1- LSB 5120YH (3) 91 as/js 1/ 2 H.F. 2065